Washington statutes.
RCW 4.44.130

Challenges—Kind and number.

Either party may challenge the jurors. The challenge shall be to individual jurors, and be peremptory or for cause. Each party shall be entitled to three peremptory challenges. When there is more than one party on either side, the parties need not join in a challenge for cause; but, they shall join in a peremptory challenge before it can be made. If the court finds that there is a conflict of interests between parties on the same side, the court may allow each conflicting party up to three peremptory challenges.

[ 1969 ex.s. c 37 s 1; Code 1881 s 207; 1877 p 43 s 211; 1854 p 165 s 186; RRS s 324.]